Montana, session 2025, SB392.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Laverne Parrish memorial highway. There is established the Laverne Parrish memorial
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 392
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 392
highway on the existing state highway 93 from mile marker 48 to mile marker 51.
(2) The department shall design and install appropriate signs marking the location of the Laverne
Parrish memorial highway.
(3) Maps that identify roadways in the state must be updated to include the location of the Laverne
Parrish memorial highway when the department updates and publishes the state maps.
Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
60, chapter 1, part 2, and the provisions of Title 60, chapter 1, part 2, apply to [section 1].
Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 392
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 392, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 392
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ
AN ACT ESTABLISHING THE LAVERNE PARRISH MEMORIAL HIGHWAY; DIRECTING THE DEPARTMENT
OF TRANSPORTATION TO INSTALL SIGNS AND TO INCLUDE THE MEMORIAL HIGHWAY ON THE NEXT
PUBLICATION OF THE STATE MAP; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.